Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 801.041, as amended by section 1,  chapter 24, Oregon Laws 2018, and section
24, chapter 93, Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
801.041. The following apply to the authority granted to counties by ORS 801.040 to  establish
registration fees for vehicles:
(1) An ordinance establishing registration fees under this section must be enacted by  the county
imposing the registration fee and filed with the Department of  Transportation. Notwithstanding
ORS 203.055 or any provision of a county charter, the governing body of a county with a  population
of 350,000 or more may enact an ordinance establishing registration fees. The governing body of a
county with a population of less than 350,000 may enact an ordinance establishing registration  fees
after submitting the ordinance to the electors of the county for their approval. The governing body
of the  county imposing the registration fee shall enter into an intergovernmental agreement under
ORS 190.010 with the department by which the department shall collect the registration fees, pay
them over to the county  and, if necessary, allow the credit or credits described in ORS 803.445 (5).
The intergovernmental agreement must state the date on  which the department shall begin collect-
ing registration fees for the county.
(2) The authority granted by this section allows the establishment of registration fees in addition
to those described in ORS 803.420 and 803.422.  There is no authority under this section to affect
registration periods, qualifications, cards,  plates, requirements or any other provision relating to
vehicle registration under the vehicle code.
(3) Except as otherwise provided for in this subsection, when registration fees are imposed under
this section, they must be imposed on all vehicle classes. Registration fees  as provided under this
section may not be imposed on the following:
(a) Snowmobiles and Class I all-terrain vehicles.
(b) Fixed load vehicles.
(c) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.100 to disabled veterans.
(d) Vehicles registered as antique vehicles under ORS 805.010.
(e) Vehicles registered as vehicles of special interest under ORS 805.020.
(f) Government-owned or operated vehicles registered under ORS 805.040 or 805.045.
(g) School buses or school activity vehicles registered under ORS 805.050.
(h) Law enforcement undercover vehicles registered under ORS 805.060.
(i) Vehicles registered on a proportional basis for interstate operation.
Enrolled House Bill 2112 (HB 2112-A) Page 1
(j) Vehicles with a registration weight of 26,001 pounds or more  described in ORS 803.420 (14)(a)
or (b).
(k) Vehicles registered as farm vehicles under the provisions of ORS 805.300.
(L) Travel trailers, campers and motor homes.
(m) Vehicles registered to an employment address as provided in ORS  802.250 when the eligible
public employee or household member’s residence address is not within the county of the employ-
ment address. The department may adopt rules it considers necessary for the administration of this
paragraph.
(n) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.110 to former prisoners of war.
(4) Any registration fee imposed by a county must be a fixed amount  not to exceed, with respect
to any vehicle class, the sum of the registration fee established under ORS 803.420 (6)(a) and  the fee
applicable to the registered vehicle under ORS 803.422. For vehicles on which a flat fee is imposed
under ORS 803.420, the fee must be a whole dollar amount.
(5) Moneys from registration fees established under this  section must be paid to the county es-
tablishing the registration fees as provided in ORS 802.110.
[(6) The county ordinance shall provide for payment of at least 40 percent of the moneys to  cities
within the county unless a different distribution is agreed upon by  the county and the cities within the
jurisdiction of the county. ]
(6) Except as provided in section 3 of this 2019 Act, or  unless a different distribution is
agreed upon by the county  and the cities within the jurisdiction of the county, the county
ordinance shall provide for payment of at  least 40 percent of the moneys from registration
fees established under this section to cities within the county.
(7) The moneys for the cities and the county shall be used for any purpose for  which moneys
from registration fees may be used, including the payment of debt service and  costs related to bonds
or other obligations issued for such purposes.
(8) Two or  more counties may act jointly to impose a registration fee under this section. The
ordinance of each county acting jointly with another  under this subsection must provide for the
distribution of moneys collected through a joint registration fee.
SECTION 2.
Section 3 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 3. (1) A county  ordinance that imposes a vehicle registration fee under ORS
801.041 is not required to provide for payment of at least 40 percent of moneys from  the
registration fee to cities within the county if the county:
(a) Has a population of 650,000 or more; and
(b) Uses the moneys from  the registration fee to pay for performing capital maintenance
on, planning, designing, replacing, acquiring necessary property for, engineering, construct-
ing or  repairing a bridge that crosses the Willamette River in the City of Portland, or the
approaches to the bridge,  including the payment of debt service and costs related to bonds
or other obligations issued for such purposes.
(2) This section applies to county vehicle  registration fees that are imposed for the pur-
pose of performing capital maintenance on, planning, designing, replacing, acquiring neces-
sary property for, engineering, constructing or  repairing a bridge that crosses the
Willamette River in the City of Portland, or the approaches to the bridge,  including the
payment of  debt service and costs related to bonds or other obligations issued for such pur-
poses.
SECTION 4.
This 2019 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 2112 (HB 2112-A) Page 2
Passed by House May 23, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 6, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2112 (HB 2112-A) Page 3